North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-04 Duties, Records, and Meetings

44-04-01.
When official reports to be made.

All county, township, and city officers, except such as are required to make their reports at some other specified time, who are required by law to make annual reports for any purpose to any state officer, shall prepare and transmit the same on or before the fifteenth day of August of each year to the proper officer. For the purpose of preparing such report, the year begins on the first day of July of each year and ends on the last day of June of the succeeding year.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 119, § 33; R.C. 1895, § 72; R.C. 1899, § 72; R.C. 1905, § 72; C.L. 1913, § 94; R.C. 1943, § 44-0401.

Cross-References.

Report of state officers and boards, see N.D.C.C. §§ 54-06-03, 54-06-04.

44-04-02.
Penalty for failure to make report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

44-04-03.
Attorney general and state’s attorney to prosecute officer for failure to make report.

Upon the willful neglect of any public officer to make any report required by law, the officer or board to whom such report should be made promptly shall notify the attorney general or the state’s attorney of such failure to report. The attorney general or state’s attorney shall investigate the neglect of duty complained of, and, if in the opinion of the attorney general or state’s attorney, the officer has not a sufficient excuse for such failure, the attorney general or state’s attorney shall prosecute such officer.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 118, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 305; R.C. 1899, § 305; R.C. 1905, § 378; C.L. 1913, § 637; R.C. 1943, § 44-0403.

Cross-References.

Knowing refusal of public servant to perform duty, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-11-06.

44-04-04.
Aliens convicted of felony or adjudged mentally ill.

Whenever any person convicted of a felony or adjudged mentally ill is committed to the custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, a county jail, or to any other county institution that is supported wholly or in part by public funds, the warden, superintendent, sheriff, or other officer in charge shall inquire immediately into the nationality of that person, and, if it appears that that person is an alien, immediately shall notify the United States immigration officer in charge of the district in which that person is located, of the date of and the reason for the commitment, the length of time for which the alien was committed, the country of which the alien is a citizen, and the date on, and the port at, which the alien last entered the United States.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 3, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 44-0404; S.L. 1995, ch. 120, § 23.

44-04-05.
Certified copies of papers on alien convicted of felony — Request by United States immigration officer.

Upon the official request of the United States immigration officer in charge of the territory or district in which is located any court committing an alien, for the commission of a felony, to any state institution supported wholly or in part by public funds, the clerk of such court shall furnish, without charge, a certified copy of the complaint, information, or indictment, and the judgment and sentence, and any other record pertaining to the case of the convicted alien.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 3, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 44-0405.

44-04-06.
Peace officers to report law violations.

The state’s attorney, assistant state’s attorney, sheriff, deputy sheriff, or peace officer of any county, township, city in this state, having any evidence, knowledge, or notice of any violation of any liquor, gambling, cigarette, snuff, pool hall, bawdyhouse, prostitution, white slave, or habit-forming drug laws of North Dakota shall investigate and seek evidence of the violation and the names of witnesses by whom the violation may be proved. Any peace officer shall report the information to the state’s attorney of the county in which the violation occurs and shall assist the state’s attorney in the prosecution of the violators of said laws.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 197, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 10143a1; R.C. 1943, § 44-0406; S.L. 1985, ch. 151, § 29.

44-04-07.
Inventory required.

The person in charge of any state department, industry, institution, board, association, or commission shall maintain, or cause to be maintained, a complete and current inventory record of all property of sufficient value and permanence as to render such inventory record practical. Each year such person shall make a complete inventory of all such property, and shall maintain such inventory, with the person’s certificate thereto attached, as to the correctness of same, in the files and records of the department, industry, institution, board, association, or commission. Said inventory record must provide a comprehensive description of each item, together with manufacturer’s serial number, or other means of positive identification, and must include statements of all property disposed of by any means whatsoever, including livestock and increase therefrom, and must be in such form and detail as may be prescribed by the department charged with the duty of auditing or examining such records.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 235, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1827; R.C. 1943, § 44-0407; S.L. 1953, ch. 270, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 44-0407; S.L. 1995, ch. 422, § 1.

44-04-08.
Duty of the heads of state institutions and state boards, departments, or offices to make reports. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 403, § 57.

44-04-09.
Nepotism.

A state official or state employee, in the exercise of that official’s or employee’s duties, may not serve in a supervisory capacity over, or enter a personal service contract with, that official’s or employee’s parent by birth or adoption, spouse, son or daughter by birth or adoption, stepchild, brother or sister by whole or half blood or by adoption, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, or son-in-law or daughter-in-law. As used in this section, “supervisory capacity” means the authority to appoint, employ, hire, assign, transfer, promote, evaluate, reward, discipline, demote, or terminate. As used in this section, “evaluate” does not include evaluations by peers or subordinates. This section does not apply to an employment relationship or contract entered before August 1, 1999; nor to any employment relationship or contract entered before the state official or employee assumed the supervisory capacity; nor to any temporary work arrangement necessary to meet a critical and urgent agency need.

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 194, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 44-0409; S.L. 1999, ch. 395, § 2.

44-04-10.
Violation of provisions against nepotism — Penalty.

Any moneys paid out, in violation of section 44-04-09, must be deducted from the salary of the hiring or contracting state official or state employee.

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 194, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 44-0410; S.L. 1999, ch. 395, § 3.

44-04-11.
Offices to be kept where required by law — Penalty for violation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

44-04-12.
Public property must be delivered to successor.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, every officer elected or appointed under the laws of this state, on going out of office, shall deliver to that officer’s successor in office all public moneys, books, records, accounts, papers, documents, and property in that officer’s possession belonging or appertaining to such office.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 5, § 14; R.C. 1895, § 358; R.C. 1899, § 358; R.C. 1905, § 421; C.L. 1913, § 682; R.C. 1943, § 44-0412.

44-04-13.
Property delivered to successor.

Upon the death, resignation, suspension, or removal from office of any officer, all books and papers belonging to the office, and all moneys and property in the officer’s hands, must be delivered to the officer’s successor.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 22, § 7; R.C. 1895, § 364; R.C. 1899, § 364; R.C. 1905, § 427; C.L. 1913, § 695; R.C. 1943, § 44-0413.

44-04-14.
Examination of records of county officers — State’s attorney to prosecute.

At the end of the term of office of each county officer, or whenever it may seem advisable, the board of county commissioners may secure an examination of the records in that person’s office by the state auditor or other competent accountants. Any failure or irregularity discovered must be remedied or the state’s attorney shall prosecute the officer guilty thereof for neglect as provided in section 44-04-03.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 98, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 307; R.C. 1899, § 307; R.C. 1905, § 2623; S.L. 1913, ch. 116; C.L. 1913, § 3543; S.L. 1933, ch. 96, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 44-0414; S.L. 1979, ch. 187, § 88.

44-04-15.
Examination of records of local officers — State’s attorney to prosecute.

At the end of the term of office of each city, township, or school district officer, the city council or board of city commissioners, board of township supervisors, or school board, as the case may be, shall examine the records of that officer’s office in the manner provided by section 44-04-14 or shall employ a competent accountant to make such examination. Upon complaint of irregularity by the proper board, the state’s attorney shall prosecute as provided in section 44-04-03.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 98, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 307; R.C. 1899, § 307; R.C. 1905, § 2623; S.L. 1913, ch. 116; C.L. 1913, § 3543; S.L. 1933, ch. 96, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 44-0415.

44-04-16.
Officer to provide blanks and records for office.

Each county, city, township, or school district officer shall provide, at the expense of the county, city, township, or school district, as the case may be, such blanks and records as are necessary for making proper records and for transacting any official business connected with the office.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 98, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 308; R.C. 1899, § 308; R.C. 1905, § 2624; C.L. 1913, § 3544; R.C. 1943, § 44-0416.

44-04-17.
Various officers’ restrictions — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

44-04-17.1.
Definitions.

As used in this section through section 44-04-32:

“Closed meeting” means all or part of an exempt meeting that a public entity in its discretion has not opened to the public, although any person necessary to carry out or further the purposes of a closed meeting may be admitted.

“Closed record” means all or part of an exempt record that a public entity in its discretion has not opened to the public.

“Confidential meeting” or “confidential record” means all or part of a record or meeting that is either expressly declared confidential or is prohibited from being open to the public.

“Executive session” means all or part of a meeting that is closed or confidential.

“Exempt meeting” or “exempt record” means all or part of a record or meeting that is neither required by law to be open to the public, nor is confidential, but may be open in the discretion of the public entity.

“Governing body” means the multimember body responsible for making a collective decision on behalf of a public entity. “Governing body” also includes any group of persons, regardless of membership, acting collectively pursuant to authority delegated to that group by the governing body.

“Information technology resources” includes data processing hardware and software or technology support services necessary to facilitate a response to a request for electronic records.

“Law” includes federal statutes, applicable federal regulations, and state statutes.

“Meeting” means a formal or informal gathering or a work session, whether in person or through any electronic means, of:

A quorum of the members of the governing body of a public entity regarding public business; or

Less than a quorum of the members of the governing body of a public entity regarding public business, if the members attending one or more of the smaller gatherings collectively constitute a quorum and if the members hold the gathering for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of section 44-04-19.

“Meeting” does not include:

A chance or social gathering at which public business is not considered;

Emergency operations during a disaster or emergency declared under section 37-17.1-10 or an equivalent ordinance if a quorum of the members of the governing body are present but are not discussing public business as the full governing body or as a task force or working group;

The attendance of members of a governing body at meetings of any national, regional, or state association to which the public entity, the governing body, or individual members belong;

Training seminars at which no other public business is considered or discussed; and

Administration of examinations by a regulatory board when no other public business is considered or discussed.

Notwithstanding subdivisions a and b, as applied to the legislative assembly, “meeting” means any gathering subject to section 14 of article IV of the Constitution of North Dakota.

“Organization or agency supported in whole or in part by public funds” means an organization or agency in any form which has received public funds exceeding the fair market value of any goods or services given in exchange for the public funds, whether through grants, membership dues, fees, or any other payment. An exchange must be conclusively presumed to be for fair market value, and does not constitute support by public funds, when an organization or agency receives a benefit under any authorized economic development program.

“Political subdivision” includes any county or city, regardless of the adoption of any home rule charter, and any airport authority, township, school district, park district, rural fire protection district, water resource district, solid waste management authority, rural ambulance service district, irrigation district, hospital district, soil conservation district, recreation service district, railroad authority, or district health unit.

“Public business” means all matters that relate or may foreseeably relate in any way to:

The performance of the public entity’s governmental functions, including any matter over which the public entity has supervision, control, jurisdiction, or advisory power; or

The public entity’s use of public funds.

“Public entity” means all:

Public or governmental bodies, boards, bureaus, commissions, or agencies of the state, including any entity created or recognized by the Constitution of North Dakota, state statute, or executive order of the governor or any task force or working group created by the individual in charge of a state agency or institution, to exercise public authority or perform a governmental function;

Public or governmental bodies, boards, bureaus, commissions, or agencies of any political subdivision of the state and any entity created or recognized by the Constitution of North Dakota, state statute, executive order of the governor, resolution, ordinance, rule, bylaw, or executive order of the chief executive authority of a political subdivision of the state to exercise public authority or perform a governmental function; and

Organizations or agencies supported in whole or in part by public funds, or expending public funds.

“Public funds” means cash and other assets with more than minimal value received from the state or any political subdivision of the state.

“Quorum” means one-half or more of the members of the governing body, or any smaller number if sufficient for a governing body to transact business on behalf of the public entity.

“Record” means recorded information of any kind, regardless of the physical form or characteristic by which the information is stored, recorded, or reproduced, which is in the possession or custody of a public entity or its agent and which has been received or prepared for use in connection with public business or contains information relating to public business. “Record” does not include unrecorded thought processes or mental impressions, but does include preliminary drafts and working papers. “Record” also does not include records in the possession of a court of this state.

“Task force or working group” means a group of individuals who have been formally appointed and delegated to meet as a group to assist, advise, or act on behalf of the individual in charge of a state agency or institution when a majority of the members of the group are not employees of the agency or institution.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 2; 2001, ch. 393, §§ 3, 4; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 3; 2009, ch. 382, § 1; 2011, ch. 332, § 2; 2017, ch. 308, § 3, effective April 12, 2017; 2021, ch. 328, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-18.
Access to public records — Electronically stored information.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all records of a public entity are public records, open and accessible for inspection during reasonable office hours. As used in this subsection, “reasonable office hours” includes all regular office hours of a public entity. If a public entity does not have regular office hours, the name and telephone number of a contact person authorized to provide access to the public entity’s records must be posted on the door of the office of the public entity, if any. Otherwise, the information regarding the contact person must be filed with the secretary of state for state-level entities, for public entities defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1, the city auditor or designee of the city for city-level entities, or the county auditor or designee of the county for other entities.

Upon request for a copy of specific public records, any entity subject to subsection 1 shall furnish the requester one copy of the public records requested. An initial request need not be made in person or in writing, and the copy must be mailed upon request. A public entity may require written clarification of the request to determine what records are being requested, but may not ask for the motive or reason for requesting the records or for the identity of the person requesting public records. A public entity may charge up to twenty-five cents per impression of a paper copy. As used in this section, “paper copy” means a one-sided or two-sided duplicated copy of a size not more than eight and one-half by fourteen inches [19.05 by 35.56 centimeters]. For any copy of a record that is not a paper copy as defined in this section, the public entity may charge a reasonable fee for making the copy. As used in this section, “reasonable fee” means the actual cost to the public entity of making the copy, including labor, materials, and equipment. The entity may charge for the actual cost of postage to mail a copy of a record. An entity may require payment before locating, redacting, making, or mailing the copy. The public entity may withhold records pursuant to a request until such time as a requester provides payment for any outstanding balance for prior requests. An entity may impose a fee not exceeding twenty-five dollars per hour per request, excluding the initial hour, for locating records, including electronic records, if locating the records requires more than one hour. An entity may impose a fee not exceeding twenty-five dollars per hour per request, excluding the initial hour, for excising confidential or closed material under section 44-04-18.10 from the records, including electronic records. If a public entity receives five or more requests from the same requester within seven days, the public entity may treat the requests as one request in computing the time it takes to locate and excise the records. If the entity is not authorized to use the fees to cover the cost of providing or mailing the copy, or both, or if a copy machine is not readily available, the entity may make arrangements for the copy to be provided or mailed, or both, by another entity, public or private, and the requester shall pay the fee to that other entity. This subsection does not apply to copies of public records for which a different fee is specifically provided by law.

Automation of public records must not erode the right of access to those records. As each public entity increases its use of and dependence on electronic recordkeeping, each agency must provide reasonable public access to records electronically maintained and must ensure that exempt or confidential records are not disclosed except as otherwise permitted by law. A public entity may not enter into a contract for the creation or maintenance of a public records database if that contract impairs the ability of the public to inspect or copy the public records of the agency, including public records online or stored in an electronic recordkeeping system used by the agency. An electronic copy of a record must be provided upon request at no cost, other than costs allowed in subsection 2, except if the nature or volume of the public records requested to be accessed or provided requires extensive use of information technology resources, the agency may charge no more than the actual cost incurred for the extensive use of information technology resources incurred by the public entity. “Extensive” is defined as a request for copies of electronic records which take more than one hour of information technology resources to produce.

Except as provided in this subsection, nothing in this section requires a public entity to create or compile a record that does not exist. Access to an electronically stored record under this section, or a copy thereof, must be provided at the requester’s option in either a printed document or through any other available medium. A computer file is not an available medium if no means exist to separate or prevent the disclosure of any closed or confidential information contained in that file. Except as reasonably necessary to reveal the organization of data contained in an electronically stored record, a public entity is not required to provide an electronically stored record in a different structure, format, or organization. This section does not require a public entity to provide a requester with access to a computer terminal or mobile device. A public entity is not required to provide a copy of a record that is available to the requester on the public entity’s website or on the internet. The public entity shall notify the requester the record is available online and direct the requester to the website where the record can be accessed. If the requester does not have reasonable access to the internet due to lack of computer, lack of internet availability, or inability to use a computer or the internet, the public entity shall produce paper copies for the requester, but may charge the applicable fees under this section.

A state-level public entity as defined in subdivision a of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 or a political subdivision as defined in subsection 11 of section 44-04-17.1, may establish procedures for providing access from an outside location to any computer database or electronically filed or stored information maintained by that entity. The procedures must address the measures that are necessary to maintain the confidentiality of information protected by federal or state law. Except for access provided to another state-level public entity or political subdivision, the state or political subdivision may charge a reasonable fee for providing that outside access. If the original information is keyed, entered, provided, compiled, or submitted by any political subdivision, the fees must be shared by the state and the political subdivision based on their proportional costs to make the data available.

Any request under this section for records in the possession of a public entity by a party to a criminal or civil action, adjudicative proceeding as defined in subsection 1 of section 28-32-01, or arbitration in which the public entity is a party, or by an agent of the party, must comply with applicable discovery rules or orders and be made to the attorney representing that entity in the criminal or civil action, adjudicative proceeding, or arbitration. The public entity may deny a request from a party or an agent of a party under this subsection if the request seeks records that are privileged under applicable discovery rules.

A denial of a request for records made under this section must describe the legal authority for the denial, or a statement that a record does not exist, and must be in writing if requested.

This section is violated when a person’s right to review or receive a copy of a record that is not exempt or confidential is denied or unreasonably delayed or when a fee is charged in excess of the amount authorized in subsections 2 and 3.

It is not an unreasonable delay or a denial of access under this section to withhold from the public a record that is prepared at the express direction of, and for presentation to, a governing body until the record is mailed or otherwise provided to a member of the body or until the next meeting of the body, whichever occurs first. It also is not an unreasonable delay or a denial of access to withhold from the public a working paper or preliminary draft until a final draft is completed, the record is distributed to a member of a governing body or discussed by the body at an open meeting, or work is discontinued on the draft but no final version has been prepared, whichever occurs first.

For public entities headed by a single individual, it is not an unreasonable delay or a denial of access to withhold from the public a working paper or preliminary draft until a final draft is completed, or work is discontinued on the draft but no final version has been prepared, whichever occurs first. A working paper or preliminary draft shall be deemed completed if it can reasonably be concluded, upon a good-faith review, that all substantive work on it has been completed.

A disclosure of a requested record under this section is not a waiver of any copyright held by the public entity in the requested record or of any applicable evidentiary privilege.

A public entity may allow an individual to utilize the individual’s own personal devices for duplication of records and, if so, shall establish reasonable procedures to protect the integrity of the records as long as the procedures are not used to prevent access to the records.

If repeated requests for records disrupt other essential functions of the public entity, the public entity may refuse to permit inspection of the records, or provide copies of the records. A public entity refusing to provide access or copies of public records under this section shall state in writing the reasons supporting the refusal and provide the reasoning to the requester. The requester may seek an attorney general’s opinion under section 44-04-21.1, on whether the public entity’s decision was proper.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 305, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 44-0418; S.L. 1977, ch. 416, § 1; 1993, ch. 441, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 3; 1999, ch. 104, § 2; 2001, ch. 393, §§ 5, 6; 2003, ch. 48, § 33; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 4; 2007, ch. 388, § 6; 2009, ch. 383, § 1; 2009, ch. 384, § 1; 2011, ch. 332, § 3; 2015, ch. 310, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 308, §§ 4, 5, effective April 12, 2017.

Cross-References.

Access to economic feasibility institute records, see N.D.C.C. § 15-12-26.

Archival resources, public access to, see N.D.C.C. §§ 55-02.1-07, 55-02.1-08.

Disclosure of domestic violence program records, see N.D.C.C. § 14-07.1-18.

For applicability of provision for access to legislative records and information, see N.D.C.C. § 44-04-18.6.

Tampering with public records prohibited, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-11-05.

44-04-18.1.
Public employee personal, medical, and employee assistance records — Confidentiality — Personal information maintained by state entities — Exempt.

Any record of a public employee’s medical treatment or use of an employee assistance program is not to become part of that employee’s personnel record and is confidential and, except as otherwise authorized by law, may not be used or disclosed without the written authorization of the employee. As used in this section, the term “public employee” includes any individual who has applied for employment, is employed, or has been employed by a public entity.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, personal information regarding a public employee contained in an employee’s personnel record or given to the state or a political subdivision by the employee in the course of employment is exempt. As used in this section, “personal information” means a person’s month and day of birth; home address; home telephone number or personal cell phone number; photograph; medical information; motor vehicle operator’s identification number; public employee identification number; payroll deduction information; the name, address, telephone number, and date of birth of any dependent or emergency contact; any credit, debit, or electronic fund transfer card number; and any account number at a bank or other financial institution. Information regarding the type of leave taken by an employee is exempt, although the amount of leave taken or accrued, and the dates of the leave taken, is public record. Information regarding leave applied for but not yet taken is exempt until the leave is taken.

Nonconfidential information contained in a personnel record of an employee of a public entity as defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 is exempt.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, personal information regarding a licensee maintained by an occupational or professional board, association, state agency, or commission created by law is exempt. As used in this section, “licensee” means an individual who has applied for, holds, or has held in the past an occupational or professional license, certificate, credential, permit, or registration issued by a state occupational or professional board, association, agency, or commission.

Information relating directly to persons engaged in an organized public safety peer counseling or a public safety peer debriefing is exempt.

Records relating to a public entity’s internal investigation of a complaint against a public entity or employee for misconduct are exempt until the investigation of the complaint is complete, but no longer than seventy-five calendar days from the date of the complaint.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 538, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 6; 1999, ch. 396, § 1; 2001, ch. 393, § 7; 2003, ch. 211, § 24; 2003, ch. 381, § 1; 2003, ch. 382, § 8; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 5; 2011, ch. 332, § 4; 2013, ch. 337, § 1; 2017, ch. 308, §§ 6, 7, effective April 12, 2017.

44-04-18.2.
Certain economic development records exempt from disclosure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 23.

44-04-18.3.
Records of juvenile court supervisors and probation officers and law enforcement and correctional employees — Law enforcement work schedules — Confidential informants.

Except as provided in subsection 5, a telephone number and the home address of a prosecutor, supreme court justice, district court judge, judicial referee, juvenile court director or probation officer, an employee of a law enforcement agency, employee of a state or local correctional facility, and an employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation are confidential. Information contained in a personnel record of an employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may not be disclosed to an inmate in the legal custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation confined in a jail, prison, or other correctional facility unless authorized by the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. Information contained in a personnel record of a law enforcement officer of a state or local law enforcement agency or in the personnel record of a correctional employee of a correctional facility subject to chapter 12-44.1 may not be disclosed to an inmate confined in a state correctional facility or correctional facility subject to chapter 12-44.1 unless authorized by the employing agency.

Records or other information that would reveal the identity, or endanger the life or physical well-being, of an undercover law enforcement officer is confidential. For purposes of this subsection, an “undercover law enforcement officer” means a full-time, salaried employee of a local or state law enforcement agency who acts surreptitiously or poses as someone other than a law enforcement officer while engaging in the investigation of a violation of law.

Any record containing the work schedule of employees of a law enforcement agency is exempt.

A law enforcement officer or prosecutor, within the scope of the employment of the officer or prosecutor, may provide assurances of confidentiality to a person providing information regarding violations of the law. Any information that would identify or provide a means of identifying a confidential informant, if the identity of the informant is not otherwise publicly known, is confidential and may be disclosed only as permitted by law.

A home address of an individual in subsection 1 which is included in a geographic information system, a property title record, or tax parcel data is confidential only if an individual in subsection 1 or the individual’s employer submits a written request to the custodian of the records. The request will remain confidential for the remainder of a calendar year and must be renewed annually.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 541, § 1; 1995, ch. 428, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 7; 2003, ch. 383, § 1; 2009, ch. 384, § 2; 2011, ch. 332, § 6; 2015, ch. 310, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 329, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of FOIA exemption 7(f), 5 U.S.C.A. § 552(b)(7)(F), which permits withholding of information compiled for law enforcement purposes if disclosure could reasonably be expected to endanger life or physical safety, 184 A.L.R. Fed. 435.

When are government records reasonably “expected to interfere with enforcement proceedings” so as to be exempt from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act provision (5 U.S.C.A. § 552(b)(7)(a)) exempting any information “compiled for law enforcement purposes” whenever it “could reasonably be expected to interfere with enforcement proceedings,” 189 A.L.R. Fed. 1.